Alaska, session 34, HB217.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 28.33.100 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 05 (j) If an applicant does not successfully complete any portion of a driving test 06 required under this section, the department may only require the applicant to retake the 07 failed or incomplete portions of the test. 08 * Sec. 2. AS 28.90 is amended by adding a new section to article 1 to read: 09 Sec. 28.90.050. Autonomous vehicles. (a) An autonomous vehicle registered 10 in this state must meet federal standards and regulations for a motor vehicle operated 11 on a public highway. 12 (b) An autonomous vehicle registered in this state may not be engaged in the 13 transport of 14 (1) commerce or goods unless the transport is for personal, 01 noncommercial use, has a gross vehicle weight of 10,000 pounds or less, and is 02 designed to transport not more than 16 passengers, including the driver; 03 (2) passengers unless the vehicle has a gross vehicle weight of 10,000 04 pounds or less and is designed to transport not more than 16 passengers. 05 (c) Except for a commercial autonomous vehicle that is transporting 06 passengers, an autonomous vehicle operated in this state must have physically present 07 in the vehicle a human safety operator who has the ability to monitor and intervene in 08 the vehicle's performance, including operating or shutting off the vehicle. 09 (d) A human safety operator must meet federal and state requirements for 10 operating autonomous and nonautonomous vehicles. 11 (e) In a civil action regarding a motor vehicle accident involving an 12 autonomous vehicle, percentage of fault and apportionment of damages shall be 13 determined under AS 09.17.080. 14 (f) The requirements of this section do not apply to a personal delivery device 15 that 16 (1) is electrically powered; 17 (2) is operated on a sidewalk or path within the right-of-way of a 18 highway; 19 (3) is intended primarily to transport property; 20 (4) weighs less than 120 pounds, excluding cargo; 21 (5) has a maximum speed of 10 miles per hour; and 22 (6) is equipped with technology to allow for operation of the device 23 with or without the active control or monitoring of an operator who monitors or 24 exercises direct physical control over the navigation system and operation of the 25 device. 26 (g) In this section, 27 (1) "autonomous technology" does not include collision avoidance 28 systems, electronic blind spot assistance, automated emergency braking systems, park 29 assist, adaptive cruise control, lane keep assist or lane departure warning systems, 30 traffic jam and queuing assist, or other systems that enhance safety or provide driver 31 assistance that are not capable, singularly or collectively, of driving the vehicle 01 without the active control or monitoring of a human safety operator; 02 (2) "autonomous vehicle" means a vehicle equipped with autonomous 03 technology that has the capability to drive a vehicle without active physical control or 04 monitoring by a human safety operator that has been integrated into that vehicle and is 05 considered to have conditional driving automation, high driving automation, or full 06 driving automation; 07 (3) "conditional driving automation" means the sustained and 08 operational design domain-specific performance by an automated driving system of 09 the entire dynamic driving task with the expectation that the dynamic driving task 10 fallback human safety operator is receptive to an automated driving system-issued 11 request to intervene, as well as to dynamic driving task performance-relevant system 12 failures in other vehicle systems, and will respond appropriately; 13 (4) "dynamic driving task" includes all real-time operational and 14 tactical functions required to operate a vehicle in traffic, but does not include trip 15 scheduling, the selection of destinations and waypoints, and other strategic functions; 16 (5) "dynamic driving task fallback" means the response by the human 17 safety operator to perform the dynamic driving task or achieve a stable, stopped 18 condition to reduce the risk of a crash after a dynamic driving task system failure, an 19 operational design domain exit, or a response by the automated driving system; 20 (6) "full driving automation" means the sustained and unconditional 21 performance by an automated driving system of the entire dynamic driving task and 22 dynamic driving task fallback without any expectation that a fallback human safety 23 operator will need to intervene; 24 (7) "high driving automation" means the sustained and operational 25 design domain-specific performance by an automated driving system of the entire 26 dynamic driving task and dynamic driving task fallback without any expectation that a 27 fallback human safety operator will need to intervene; 28 (8) "operational design domain" includes the environmental, 29 geographical, and time-of-day restrictions, presence or absence of roadway or traffic 30 characteristics, and other operating conditions under which a given driving automation 31 system or feature is specifically designed to function. 01 * Sec. 3. This Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.